Missouri, session 2026, HB3116.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 287.200, 287.470, 347.143, 347.186, 506.290, 510.030, and
515.625, RSMo, are repealed and sixteen new sections enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as
sections 287.200, 287.470, 347.044, 347.143, 347.186, 506.290, 510.030, 510.500, 510.503,
510.506, 510.509, 510.512, 510.515, 510.518, 510.521, and 515.625, to read as follows:
287.200. 1. Compensation for permanent total disability shall be paid during the
continuance of such disability from the date of maximum medical improvement for the
lifetime of the employee at the weekly rate of compensation in effect under this subsection on
the date of the injury for which compensation is being made. The word "employee" as used
in this section shall not include the injured worker's dependents, estate, or other persons to
whom compensation may be payable as provided in subsection 1 of section 287.020. The
amount of such compensation shall be computed as follows:
(1) For all injuries occurring on or after September 28, 1983, but before September
28, 1986, the weekly compensation shall be an amount equal to sixty-six and two-thirds
percent of the injured employee's average weekly earnings during the year immediately
preceding the injury, as of the date of the injury; provided that the weekly compensation paid
under this subdivision shall not exceed an amount equal to seventy percent of the state
average weekly wage, as such wage is determined by the division of employment security, as
of the July first immediately preceding the date of injury;
(2) For all injuries occurring on or after September 28, 1986, but before August 28,
1990, the weekly compensation shall be an amount equal to sixty-six and two-thirds percent
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HCS HB 3116 2
of the injured employee's average weekly earnings during the year immediately preceding the
injury, as of the date of the injury; provided that the weekly compensation paid under this
subdivision shall not exceed an amount equal to seventy-five percent of the state average
weekly wage, as such wage is determined by the division of employment security, as of the
July first immediately preceding the date of injury;
(3) For all injuries occurring on or after August 28, 1990, but before August 28, 1991,
the weekly compensation shall be an amount equal to sixty-six and two-thirds percent of the
injured employee's average weekly earnings as of the date of the injury; provided that the
weekly compensation paid under this subdivision shall not exceed an amount equal to one
hundred percent of the state average weekly wage;
(4) For all injuries occurring on or after August 28, 1991, the weekly compensation
shall be an amount equal to sixty-six and two-thirds percent of the injured employee's average
weekly earnings as of the date of the injury; provided that the weekly compensation paid
under this subdivision shall not exceed an amount equal to one hundred five percent of the
state average weekly wage;
(5) For all injuries occurring on or after September 28, 1981, the weekly
compensation shall in no event be less than forty dollars per week.
2. Permanent total disability benefits that have accrued through the date of the injured
employee's death are the only permanent total disability benefits that are to be paid in
accordance with section 287.230. The right to unaccrued compensation for permanent total
disability of an injured employee terminates on the date of the injured employee's death in
accordance with section 287.230, and does not survive to the injured employee's dependents,
estate, or other persons to whom compensation might otherwise be payable.
3. (1) All claims for permanent total disability shall be determined in accordance
with the facts. When an injured employee receives an award for permanent total disability
but by the use of glasses, prosthetic appliances, or physical rehabilitation the employee is
restored to his or her regular work or its equivalent, the life payment mentioned in subsection
1 of this section shall be suspended during the time in which the employee is restored to his or
her regular work or its equivalent. The employer and the division shall keep the file open in
the case during the lifetime of any injured employee who has received an award of permanent
total disability. In any case where the life payment is suspended under this subsection, the
commission may at reasonable times review the case and either the employee or the employer
may request an informal conference with the commission relative to the resumption of the
employee's weekly life payment in the case.
(2) Upon the filing of a written agreement signed by the claimant and his or her
attorney, the commission shall change the name, information, or fee arrangement of the
attorney or law firm associated with the claimant's case.

HCS HB 3116 3
4. For all claims filed on or after January 1, 2014, for occupational diseases due to
toxic exposure which result in a permanent total disability or death, benefits in this chapter
shall be provided as follows:
(1) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, such amount as due to the
employee during said employee's life as provided for under this chapter for an award of
permanent total disability and death, except such amount shall only be paid when benefits
under subdivisions (2) and (3) of this subsection have been exhausted;
(2) For occupational diseases due to toxic exposure, but not including mesothelioma,
an amount equal to two hundred percent of the state's average weekly wage as of the date of
diagnosis for one hundred weeks paid by the employer; and
(3) In cases where occupational diseases due to toxic exposure are diagnosed to be
mesothelioma:
(a) For employers that have elected to accept mesothelioma liability under this
subsection, an additional amount of three hundred percent of the state's average weekly wage
for two hundred twelve weeks shall be paid by the employer or group of employers such
employer is a member of. Employers that elect to accept mesothelioma liability under this
subsection may do so by either insuring their liability, by qualifying as a self-insurer, or by
becoming a member of a group insurance pool. A group of employers may enter into an
agreement to pool their liabilities under this subsection. If such group is joined, individual
members shall not be required to qualify as individual self-insurers. Such group shall comply
with section 287.223. In order for an employer to make such an election, the employer shall
provide the department with notice of such an election in a manner established by the
department. The provisions of this paragraph shall expire on December 31, 2038; or
(b) For employers who reject mesothelioma under this subsection, then the exclusive
remedy provisions under section 287.120 shall not apply to such liability. The provisions of
this paragraph shall expire on December 31, 2038; and
(4) The provisions of subdivision (2) and paragraph (a) of subdivision (3) of this
subsection shall not be subject to suspension of benefits as provided in subsection 3 of this
section; and
(5) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter to the contrary, should the
employee die before the additional benefits provided for in subdivision (2) and paragraph (a)
of subdivision (3) of this subsection are paid, the additional benefits are payable to the
employee's spouse or children, natural or adopted, legitimate or illegitimate, in addition to
benefits provided under section 287.240. If there is no surviving spouse or children and the
employee has received less than the additional benefits provided for in subdivision (2) and
paragraph (a) of subdivision (3) of this subsection the remainder of such additional benefits
shall be paid as a single payment to the estate of the employee;

HCS HB 3116 4
(6) The provisions of subdivision (1) of this subsection shall not be construed to
affect the employee's ability to obtain medical treatment at the employer's expense or any
other benefits otherwise available under this chapter.
5. Any employee who obtains benefits under subdivision (2) of subsection 4 of this
section for acquiring asbestosis who later obtains an award for mesothelioma shall not receive
more benefits than such employee would receive having only obtained benefits for
mesothelioma under this section.
287.470. 1. Upon its own motion or upon the application of any party in interest on
the ground of a change in condition, the commission may at any time upon a rehearing after
due notice to the parties interested review any award and on such review may make an award
ending, diminishing or increasing the compensation previously awarded, subject to the
maximum or minimum provided in this chapter, and shall immediately send to the parties and
the employer's insurer a copy of the award. No such review shall affect such award as regards
any moneys paid.
2. Upon the filing of a written agreement signed by the claimant and his or her
attorney and the new attorney, the commission shall change the name, information, or
fee arrangement of the attorney or law firm associated with the claimant's case.
347.044. 1. Any person may apply to the secretary of state for a certificate of
good standing for a domestic limited liability company or a foreign limited liability
company.
2. A certificate of good standing for a domestic limited liability company shall
include:
(1) The domestic limited liability company's name;
(2) When the limited liability company was formed;
(3) That the limited liability company was formed under the laws of this state;
and
(4) That the limited liability company has complied with all the requirements of
the corporation division of the secretary of state.
3. A certificate of good standing for a foreign limited liability company shall
include:
(1) The name of the limited liability company as registered in the company's
home state;
(2) The name the foreign limited liability company uses in this state;
(3) The name of the state or jurisdiction the limited liability company was
formed in; and
(4) That the limited liability company has complied with all the requirements of
the corporation division of the secretary of state.

HCS HB 3116 5
4. Subject to any qualification stated in the certificate, a certificate of good
standing issued by the secretary of state shall be prima facie evidence that the domestic
or foreign limited liability company exists and is authorized to transact business in this
state.
5. Any person may apply to the secretary of state for a certificate of good
standing for any individual domestic limited liability company series or a foreign limited
liability company series.
6. A certificate of good standing for a domestic limited liability company series
shall include:
(1) The domestic limited liability company series' name;
(2) When the limited liability company series was formed;
(3) That the limited liability company series was formed under the laws of this
state; and
(4) That the limited liability company series has complied with all the
requirements of the corporation division of the secretary of state.
7. A certificate of good standing for a foreign limited liability company series
shall include:
(1) The name of the limited liability company series as registered in the
company's home state;
(2) The name the foreign limited liability company series uses in this state;
(3) The name of the state or jurisdiction the limited liability company series was
formed in; and
(4) That the limited liability company series has complied with all the
requirements of the corporation division of the secretary of state.
8. Subject to any qualification stated in the certificate, a certificate of good
standing issued by the secretary of state shall be prima facie evidence that the domestic
or foreign limited liability company series exists and is authorized to transact business
in this state.
347.143. 1. A limited liability company may be dissolved involuntarily by a decree
of the circuit court for the county in which the registered office of the limited liability
company is situated in an action filed by the attorney general when it is established that the
limited liability company:
(1) Has procured its articles of organization through fraud;
(2) Has exceeded or abused the authority conferred upon it by law;
(3) Has carried on, conducted, or transacted its business in a fraudulent or illegal
manner; or

HCS HB 3116 6
(4) By the abuse of its powers contrary to the public policy of the state, has become
liable to be dissolved.
2. On application by or for a member, the circuit court for the county in which the
registered office of the limited liability company is located may decree dissolution of a
limited liability company [whenever] if the court determines:
(1) It is not reasonably practicable to carry on the business in conformity with the
operating agreement;
(2) Dissolution is reasonably necessary for the protection of the rights or
interests of the complaining members;
(3) The business of the limited liability company has been abandoned;
(4) The management of the limited liability company is deadlocked or subject to
internal dissension;
(5) The business operations of the limited liability company are substantially
impaired; or
(6) Those in control of the limited liability company have been found guilty of, or
have knowingly countenanced, persistent and pervasive fraud, mismanagement, or
abuse of authority.
347.186. 1. An operating agreement may establish or provide for the establishment
of a designated series of members, managers, or limited liability company interests having
separate rights, powers, or duties with respect to specified property or obligations of the
limited liability company or profits and losses associated with specified property or
obligations. To the extent provided in the operating agreement, any such series may have a
separate business purpose or investment objective.
2. (1) Notwithstanding any other provisions of law to the contrary, the debts,
liabilities, and obligations incurred, contracted for, or otherwise existing with respect to a
particular series shall be enforceable against the assets of such series only, and not against the
assets of the limited liability company generally or any other series thereof. Such particular
series shall be deemed to have possession, custody, and control only of the books, records,
information, and documentation related to such series and not of the books, records,
information, and documentation related to the limited liability company as a whole or any
other series thereof if all of the following apply:
(a) The operating agreement creates one or more series;
(b) Separate and distinct records are maintained for or on behalf of any such series;
(c) The assets associated with any such series, whether held directly or indirectly,
including through a nominee or otherwise, are accounted for separately from the other assets
of the limited liability company or of any other series;

HCS HB 3116 7
(d) The operating agreement provides for the limitations on liabilities of a series
described in this subdivision;
(e) Notice of the limitation on liabilities of a series described in this subdivision is
included in the limited liability company's articles of organization; and
(f) The limited liability company has filed articles of organization that separately
identify each series which is to have limited liability under this section.
(2) With respect to a particular series, unless otherwise provided in the operating
agreement, none of the debts, liabilities, obligations, and expenses incurred, contracted for or
otherwise existing with respect to a limited liability company generally, or any other series
thereof, shall be enforceable against the assets of such series, subject to the provisions of
subdivision (1) of this subsection.
(3) Compliance with paragraphs (e) and (f) of subdivision (1) of this subsection shall
constitute notice of such limitation of liability of a series.
(4) A series with limited liability shall be treated as a separate entity to the extent set
forth in the articles of organization. Each series with limited liability may, in its own name,
contract, hold title to assets, grant security interests, sue and be sued, and otherwise conduct
business and exercise the powers of a limited liability company under this chapter. The
limited liability company and any of its series may elect to consolidate its operations as a
single taxpayer to the extent permitted under applicable law, elect to work cooperatively, elect
to contract jointly, or elect to be treated as a single business for the purposes of qualification
or authorization to do business in this or any other state. Such elections shall not affect the
limitation of liability set forth in this section except to the extent that the series have
specifically accepted joint liability by contract. Not later than January 31, 2027, each
series shall be individually profiled, maintained, and searchable as a business entity on
the secretary of state's business services website in the same manner that a non-series
entity is profiled, maintained, and searchable.
3. Except in the case of a foreign limited liability company that has adopted a name
that is not the name under which it is registered in its jurisdiction of organization, as permitted
under sections 347.153 and 347.157, the name of the series with limited liability is required to
contain the entire name of the limited liability company and be distinguishable from the
names of the other series set forth in the articles of organization. In the case of a foreign
limited liability company that has adopted a name that is not the name under which it is
registered in its jurisdiction of organization, as permitted under sections 347.153 and 347.157,
the name of the series with limited liability must contain the entire name under which the
foreign limited liability company has been admitted to transact business in this state.

HCS HB 3116 8
4. (1) (a) Upon filing of articles of organization setting forth the name of each series
with limited liability, in compliance with section 347.037 or amendments under section
347.041, the series' existence shall begin.
(b) Each copy of the articles of organization stamped "Filed" and marked with the
filing date shall be conclusive evidence that all required conditions have been met and that the
series has been or shall be legally organized and formed under this section and is notice for all
purposes of all other facts required to be set forth therein.
(c) The name of a series with limited liability under this section may be changed by
filing articles of amendment with the secretary of state pursuant to section 347.041,
identifying the series whose name is being changed and the new name of such series. If not
the same as the limited liability company, the names of the members of a member-managed
series or of the managers of a manager-managed series may be changed by an amendment to
the articles of organization with the secretary of state.
(d) A series with limited liability under this section may be dissolved by filing with
the secretary of state articles of amendment pursuant to section 347.041 identifying the series
being dissolved or by the dissolution of the limited liability company as provided in section
347.045. Except to the extent otherwise provided in the operating agreement, a series may be
dissolved and its affairs wound up without causing the dissolution of the limited liability
company. The dissolution of a series established in accordance with subsection 2 of this
section shall not affect the limitation on liabilities of such series provided by subsection 2 of
this section. A series is terminated and its affairs shall be wound up upon the dissolution of
the limited liability company under section 347.045.
(e) Articles of organization, amendment, or termination described under this
subdivision may be executed by the limited liability company or any manager, person, or
entity designated in the operating agreement for the limited liability company.
(2) If different from the limited liability company, the articles of organization shall
list the names of the members for each series if the series is member-managed or the names of
the managers if the series is manager-managed.
(3) A series of a limited liability company shall be deemed to be in good standing as
long as the limited liability company is in good standing. A series of a limited liability
company that is in good standing shall be able to obtain a stand-alone certificate of good
standing from the secretary of state under section 347.044.
(4) The registered agent and registered office for the limited liability company
appointed under section 347.033 shall serve as the agent and office for service of process for
each series in this state.
5. (1) An operating agreement may provide for classes or groups of members or
managers associated with a series having such relative rights, powers, and duties as an

HCS HB 3116 9
operating agreement may provide and may make provision for the future creation of
additional classes or groups of members or managers associated with the series having such
relative rights, powers, and duties as may from time to time be established, including rights,
powers, and duties senior and subordinate to or different from existing classes and groups of
members or managers associated with the series.
(2) A series may be managed either by the member or members associated with the
series or by the manager or managers chosen by the members of such series, as provided in
the operating agreement. Unless otherwise provided in an operating agreement, the
100 management of a series shall be vested in the members associated with such series.
101 (3) An operating agreement may grant to all or certain identified members or
102 managers, or to a specified class or group of the members or managers associated with a
103 series, the right to vote separately or with all or any class or group of the members or
104 managers associated with the series, on any matter. An operating agreement may provide that
105 any member or class or group of members associated with a series shall have no voting rights
106 or ability to otherwise participate in the management or governance of such series, but any
107 such member or class or group of members are owners of the series.
108 (4) Except as modified in this section, the provisions of this chapter which are
109 generally applicable to limited liability companies and their managers, members, and
110 transferees shall be applicable to each particular series with respect to the operation of such
111 series.
112 (5) Except as otherwise provided in an operating agreement, any event specified in
113 this chapter or in an operating agreement that causes a manager to cease to be a manager with
114 respect to a series shall not, in itself, cause such manager to cease to be a manager of the
115 limited liability company or with respect to any other series thereof.
116 (6) Except as otherwise provided in an operating agreement, any event specified in
117 this chapter or in an operating agreement that causes a member to cease to be associated with
118 a series shall not, in itself, cause such member to cease to be associated with any other series,
119 terminate the continued membership of a member in the limited liability company, or cause
120 the termination of the series, regardless of whether such member was the last remaining
121 member associated with such series.
122 (7) An operating agreement may impose restrictions, duties, and obligations on
123 members of the limited liability company or any series thereof as a matter of internal
124 governance, including, without limitation, those with regard to:
125 (a) Choice of law, forum selection, or consent to personal jurisdiction;
126 (b) Capital contributions;
127 (c) Restrictions on, or terms and conditions of, the transfer of membership interests;

HCS HB 3116 10
128 (d) Restrictive covenants, including noncompetition, nonsolicitation, and
129 confidentiality provisions;
130 (e) Fiduciary duties; and
131 (f) Restrictions, duties, or obligations to or for the benefit of the limited liability
132 company, other series thereof, or their affiliates.
133 6. (1) If a limited liability company with the ability to establish series does not
134 register to do business in a foreign jurisdiction for itself and its series, a series of a limited
135 liability company may itself register to do business as a limited liability company in the
136 foreign jurisdiction in accordance with the laws of the foreign jurisdiction.
137 (2) If a foreign limited liability company, as permitted in the jurisdiction of its
138 organization, has established a series having separate rights, powers, or duties and has limited
139 the liabilities of such series so that the debts, liabilities, and obligations incurred, contracted
140 for, or otherwise existing with respect to a particular series are enforceable against the assets
141 of such series only, and not against the assets of the limited liability company generally or any
142 other series thereof, or so that the debts, liabilities, obligations, and expenses incurred,
143 contracted for, or otherwise existing with respect to the limited liability company generally or
144 any other series thereof are not enforceable against the assets of such series, then the limited
145 liability company, on behalf of itself or any of its series, or any of its series on its own behalf
146 may register to do business in this state in accordance with this chapter. The limitation of
147 liability shall also be stated on the application for registration. As required under section
148 347.153, the registration application filed shall identify each series being registered to do
149 business in the state by the limited liability company. Unless otherwise provided in the
150 operating agreement, the debts, liabilities, and obligations incurred, contracted for, or
151 otherwise existing with respect to a particular series of such a foreign limited liability
152 company shall be enforceable against the assets of such series only and not against the assets
153 of the foreign limited liability company generally or any other series thereof, and none of the
154 debts, liabilities, obligations, and expenses incurred, contracted for, or otherwise existing with
155 respect to such a foreign limited liability company generally or any other series thereof shall
156 be enforceable against the assets of such series.
157 7. Nothing in sections 347.039, 347.153, or 347.186 shall be construed to alter
158 existing Missouri statute or common law providing any cause of action for fraudulent
159 conveyance, including but not limited to chapter 428, or any relief available under existing
160 law that permits a challenge to limited liability.
506.290. 1. Any suit under the provisions of sections 506.200 to [506.320] 506.310
shall be filed in the county in which the cause of action accrues or in the county where the
plaintiff resides, and if there be other defendants in such action who are residents of the state
of Missouri, then such action shall be brought in any county in which any one of said

HCS HB 3116 11
defendants resides, or in the county within which the plaintiff resides and the defendant may
be found.
2. Any civil suit under the provisions of section 570.223 for a person charged with
identity theft may be filed:
(1) In the county in which the offense is committed;
(2) If the offense is committed partly in one county and partly in another, or if the
elements of the offense occur in more than one county, then in any of the counties where any
element of the offense occurred;
(3) In the county in which the defendant resides;
(4) In the county in which the victim resides; or
(5) In the county in which the property obtained or attempted to be obtained was
located.
510.030. 1. Upon motion of any party showing good cause therefor and upon notice
to all other parties, the court in which an action is pending may:
(1) Order any party to produce and permit the inspection and copying or
photographing, by or on behalf of the moving party, of any designated documents, papers,
books, accounts, letters, photographs, objects, or tangible things, not privileged, which
constitute or contain evidence material to any matter involved in the action and which are in
his or her possession, custody, or control; or
(2) Order any party to permit entry upon designated land or other property in his or
her possession or control for the purpose of inspecting, measuring, surveying, sampling, or
photographing the property or any designated relevant object or operation thereon. The order
shall specify the time, place, and manner of making the inspection and taking the copies and
photographs and may prescribe such terms and conditions as are just.
2. A party may obtain without the required showing a statement concerning the action
or its subject matter previously made by that party. For purposes of this subsection, a
statement previously made is a written statement signed or otherwise adopted or approved by
the person making it, or a stenographic, mechanical, electrical, audio, video, motion picture or
other recording, or a transcription thereof, of the party or of a statement made by the party and
contemporaneously recorded.
510.500. Sections 510.500 to 510.521 shall be known and may be cited as the
"Uniform Interstate Depositions and Discovery Act".
510.503. As used in sections 510.500 to 510.521, the following terms mean:
(1) "Foreign jurisdiction", a state other than this state;
(2) "Foreign subpoena", a subpoena issued under authority of a court of record
of a foreign jurisdiction;

HCS HB 3116 12
(3) "Person", an individual, corporation, business trust, estate, trust,
partnership, limited liability company, association, joint venture, public corporation,
government or political subdivision, agency or instrumentality, or any other legal or
commercial entity;
(4) "State", a state of the United States, the District of Columbia, Puerto Rico,
the United States Virgin Islands, a federally recognized Indian tribe, or any territory or
insular possession subject to the jurisdiction of the United States;
(5) "Subpoena", a document, however denominated, issued under authority of a
court of record requiring a person to:
(a) Attend and give testimony at a deposition;
(b) Produce and permit inspection and copying of designated books, documents,
records, electronically stored information, or tangible items in the possession, custody,
or control of the person; or
(c) Permit inspection of premises under the control of the person.
510.506. 1. To request issuance of a subpoena under this section, a party shall
submit a foreign subpoena to a clerk of court in the county in which discovery is sought
to be conducted in this state. A request for the issuance of a subpoena under sections
510.500 to 510.521 shall not constitute an appearance in the courts of this state.
2. If a party submits a foreign subpoena to a clerk of court in this state, the clerk,
in accordance with such court's procedure, shall promptly issue a subpoena for service
upon the person to which the foreign subpoena is directed.
3. A subpoena under subsection 2 of this section shall:
(1) Incorporate the terms used in the foreign subpoena; and
(2) Contain or be accompanied by the names, addresses, and telephone numbers
of all counsel of record in the proceeding to which the subpoena relates and of any party
not represented by counsel.
510.509. A subpoena issued by a clerk of court under section 510.506 shall be
served in compliance with the Missouri supreme court rules of civil procedure and laws
of this state.
510.512. The Missouri supreme court rules of civil procedure and laws of this
state, and any amendments thereto, apply to subpoenas issued under section 510.506.
510.515. An application to the court for a protective order or to enforce, quash,
or modify a subpoena issued by a clerk of court under section 510.506 shall comply with
the Missouri supreme court rules of civil procedure and statutes of this state and be
submitted to the court in the county in which discovery is to be conducted.

HCS HB 3116 13
510.518. In applying and construing sections 510.500 to 510.521, consideration
shall be given to the need to promote uniformity of the law with respect to its subject
matter among states that enact it.
510.521. Sections 510.500 to 510.521 apply to requests for discovery in cases
pending on August 28, 2026.
515.625. 1. Claims not disallowed by the court shall receive distribution under
sections 515.500 to 515.665 in the order of priority under subdivisions (1) to (8) of this
subsection and, with the exception of subdivisions (1) to (3) of this subsection, on a pro rata
basis:
(1) Any secured creditor that is duly perfected under applicable law, whether or not
such secured creditor has filed a proof of claim, shall receive the proceeds from the
disposition of the estate property that secures its claim. However, the receiver may recover
from estate property secured by a lien or the proceeds thereof the reasonable, necessary
expenses of preserving, protecting, or disposing of the estate property to the extent of any
benefit to a duly perfected secured creditor. If and to the extent that the proceeds are less than
the amount of a duly perfected secured creditor's claim or a duly perfected secured creditor's
lien is avoided on any basis, the duly perfected secured creditor's claim is an unsecured claim
under subdivision (8) of this subsection. Duly perfected secured claims shall be paid from the
proceeds in accordance with their respective priorities under otherwise applicable law;
(2) Actual, necessary costs, and expenses incurred during the administration of the
receivership, other than those expenses allowable under subdivision (1) of this subsection,
including allowed fees and reimbursement of reasonable charges and expenses of the receiver
and professional persons employed by the receiver. Notwithstanding subdivision (1) of this
subsection, expenses incurred during the administration of the estate have priority over the
secured claim of any secured creditor obtaining or consenting to the appointment of the
receiver;
(3) A secured creditor that is not duly perfected under applicable law shall receive the
proceeds from the disposition of the estate property that secures its claim if and to the extent
that unsecured claims are made subject to those liens under applicable law;
(4) Claims for wages, salaries, or commissions, including vacation, severance, and
sick leave pay, or contributions to an employee benefit plan earned by the claimant within one
hundred eighty days of the date of appointment of the receiver or the cessation of any
business relating to the receivership, whichever occurs first, but only to the extent of ten
thousand nine hundred fifty dollars;
(5) Unsecured claims, to the extent of two thousand four hundred twenty-five dollars
for each natural person, arising from the deposit with the person debtor before the date of
appointment of the receiver of money in connection with the purchase, lease, or rental of

HCS HB 3116 14
estate property or the purchase of services for personal, family, or household use that were not
delivered or provided;
(6) Claims for a marital, family, or other support debt, but not to the extent that the
debt is assigned to another person, voluntarily, by operation of law, or otherwise; or includes
a liability designated as a support obligation unless that liability is actually in the nature of a
support obligation;
(7) Unsecured claims of governmental units for taxes which accrued prior to the date
of appointment of the receiver;
(8) Other unsecured claims.
2. If all of the classes under subsection 1 of this section have been paid in full, any
residue shall be paid to the debtor.
✔